Louisiana, session 2026, HB751.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:920 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§920. Term life insurance; pre-sale disclosure required
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the meanings:
(1) "Applicant" means a natural person who applies for or is solicited to
purchase a term life insurance policy.
(2) "Clear and conspicuous" means printed in not less than fourteen point
type, in a color that provides a clear contrast against the background, and set apart
from other text so as to be readily noticeable, readable, and understandable by an
ordinary person.
(3) "Insurer" means an insurance company, association, or other entity
authorized to issue life insurance policies in this state.
(4) "Producer" means an insurance producer, agent, broker, or other person
who sells, solicits, or negotiates a term life insurance policy or group term life
insurance certificate on behalf of an insurer.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-41 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 751
(5) "Term life insurance policy" means an individual term life insurance
policy, a group term life insurance policy, a group term life insurance certificate, or
any similar policy or certificate that provides life insurance coverage for a specified
term of years, including but not limited to decreasing term life insurance and
return-of-premium term life insurance.
B.(1) An insurer or producer shall not issue. deliver, or contract for a term
life insurance policy to an applicant in this state unless the insurer or producer has
provided the applicant with a disclosure notice prior to the applicant's execution of
the application or enrollment form, and the applicant has initialed each line of that
disclosure notice and signed and dated the bottom of the page.
(2) The disclosure notice required by this Section shall be a standalone
document, separate from the application, the policy, and any other forms, documents,
or materials provided to the applicant, and shall be provided on a separate sheet of
paper or, if the transaction is conducted electronically, on a separate electronic page.
The disclosure notice shall contain only the information listed in Subsection C of this
Section and no other text, advertising, marketing material, or extraneous information,
except as provided in Subsection D of this Section.
C. The disclosure notice required by this Section shall contain all of the
following information, presented in clear and conspicuous text:
(1) A heading in bold type reading: "TERM LIFE INSURANCE
DISCLOSURE NOTICE--PLEASE READ BEFORE SIGNING."
(2) The total face amount of coverage payable to the beneficiary upon the
death of the insured or upon the occurrence of any other event that triggers payment
of the benefit under the policy during the term of coverage. If the policy provides for
a benefit amount that varies over the term of the policy, including but not limited to
decreasing term life insurance, the disclosure notice shall state the initial face amount
and include a schedule or description showing the amount payable at each point
during the term at which the benefit amount changes.
(3) The duration for which the policy provides coverage, stated as follows:
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-41 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 751
(a) The total number of years of the term.
(b) The total number of premium payments or premium payment periods
required over the full term of the policy.
(4) The cost of the policy to the applicant, stated as follows:
(a) The amount of each individual premium payment and the frequency of
such payments, whether monthly, quarterly, semi-annually, annually, or otherwise.
(b) The total amount that the insured would pay in premiums over the full
term of the policy if the insured survives to the expiration of the term and all
scheduled premium payments are made.
(5) Information regarding the status of coverage at the expiration of the term,
stated as follows:
(a) The amount of coverage, if any, that is available for renewal upon
expiration of the term, and a statement of whether such renewal is guaranteed or
subject to underwriting or other conditions. If no renewal coverage is available, the
disclosure notice shall state: "This policy does not provide for renewal. Coverage
terminates at the end of the term."
(b) The age, expressed in years and months, that the insured will have
attained if the insured survives to the expiration of the term. The age shall be
calculated from the applicant's date of birth as provided in the application.
D. The disclosure notice may include any of the following information:
(1) The name of the insurer.
(2) The name of the applicant.
(3) The policy or application number, if assigned.
E.(1) If a group term life insurance policy requires the individual insured to
contribute to the premium, the insurer or the group policyholder shall provide the
disclosure notice required by this Section to each certificate holder or enrollee prior
to enrollment.
(2) If an employer or group policyholder pays the entire premium and no
contribution is required of the individual insured, the disclosure notice shall include
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-41 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 751
a statement that the employer or group policyholder pays the full premium cost of
the coverage and may not include the information required by Paragraph (C)(4) of
this Section.
F. The applicant shall initial each line and sign and date at the bottom of
disclosure notice to acknowledge receipt prior to executing the application or
enrollment form. The insurer or producer shall retain the signed disclosure notice as
part of the policy file for not less than five years following the expiration or
termination of the policy.
G. If the application or enrollment is conducted electronically, the disclosure
notice may be delivered electronically if the disclosure notice is displayed on a
separate electronic page that the applicant shall affirmatively acknowledge before
proceeding to complete the application. An electronic signature or affirmative
electronic acknowledgment satisfies the requirements of Subsection E of this
Section.
H.(1) Failure to provide the disclosure notice required by this Section does
not affect the validity or enforceability of the underlying insurance policy or
certificate, however, if the insurer or producer fails to provide the disclosure notice
prior to the applicant's execution of the application or enrollment form, the insured
may cancel the policy at any time before the thirtieth day following the date on
which the insured initials, signs, and returns the disclosure notice to the insurer or
producer. An insured who cancels a policy pursuant to this Paragraph shall receive
a full refund of all premiums paid.
(2) Failure to provide the disclosure notice required by this Section
constitutes an unfair trade practice subject to the provisions of R.S. 22:1961 et seq.
(3) The commissioner of insurance may promulgate rules and regulations
necessary for the implementation and enforcement of this Section in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act.
I. A violation of this Section shall constitute an unfair trade practice under
R.S. 22:1961 et seq. and shall subject the violator to the penalties provided in R.S.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-41 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 751
22:1971 et seq., in addition to any other remedies available under law. The
commissioner of insurance may also suspend or revoke the license of any producer
or insurer found in violation after notice and hearing.